Georgia statutes. 
Immunity from federal antitrust liability. - City's anticompetitive operation of a waterworks is protected from federal antitrust liability by the state action immunity doctrine under Parker v. Brown, 317 U.S. 341, 63 S. Ct. 307, 87 L. Ed. 315 (1943), and its progeny. McCallum v. City of Athens, 976 F.2d 649 (11th Cir. 1992).

Claim of state-action immunity did not entitle a city to dismissal of a suit alleging the city violated the Sherman and Clayton Acts by tying its water-utility service to its natural-gas service for some customers because Georgia's policy to displace federal antitrust law as to municipal anticompetitive conduct in providing water and sewage services does not have as an inherent, logical, or ordinary result that cities would use their water monopoly to increase their share of an unrelated market. Diverse Power, Inc. v. City of Lagrange, 934 F.3d 1270 (11th Cir. 2019).

Construction with O.C.G.A. § 36-36-7. - In a dispute concerning a city's desire to access water lines owned by a county but located in an area annexed by the city, it was determined, upon discerning the interplay between O.C.G.A. §§ 36-34-5 and 36-36-7(b), that the city was not permitted access to the line in question absent compliance with one of the three methods enumerated in § 36-34-5, namely by gift, purchase, or the exercise of the right of eminent domain. Cobb County v. City of Smyrna, 270 Ga. App. 471, 606 S.E.2d 667 (2004).

Cited in Coweta County v. City of Newnan, 253 Ga. 457, 320 S.E.2d 747 (1984).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 501 et seq.

ALR. - Power of state to exact fee or require license for taking water from stream, 29 A.L.R. 1478.

Duty of public utility to duplicate service, 52 A.L.R. 1111.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise, 123 A.L.R. 997.

Power of municipality to agree to abide by conditions or regulations imposed by federal authority in respect of construction, maintenance, or operation of a municipal public utility plant or enterprise, 128 A.L.R. 620.

Waters: right of municipality, as riparian owner, to use of water for public supply, 141 A.L.R. 639.

Liability of municipality for fire loss due to its failure to provide or maintain adequate water supply or pressure, 163 A.L.R. 348.

Liability of municipal corporation for damage to property resulting from inadequacy of drains and sewers due to defects in plan, 173 A.L.R. 1031.

Discrimination between property within and that outside municipality or other governmental district as to public service or utility rates, 4 A.L.R.2d 595.

Granting or taking of lease of property by municipality as within authorization of purchase or acquisition thereof, 11 A.L.R.2d 168.

Right of municipality or public to use of subsurface of street or highway for purposes other than sewers, pipes, conduits for wires, and the like, 11 A.L.R.2d 180.

Right to compel municipality to extend its water system, 48 A.L.R.2d 1222.

Municipal operation of sewage disposal plant as governmental or proprietary function, for purposes of tort liability, 57 A.L.R.2d 1336.

Municipality's liability for damage resulting from obstruction or clogging of drains or sewers, 59 A.L.R.2d 281.

Municipality's liability arising from negligence or other wrongful act in carrying out construction or repair of sewers and drains, 61 A.L.R.2d 874.

Right to condemn property in excess of needs for a particular public purpose, 6 A.L.R.3d 297.

Propriety of injunctive relief against diversion of water by municipal corporation or public utility, 42 A.L.R.3d 426.

Right of municipality to refuse services provided by it to resident for failure of resident to pay for other unrelated services, 60 A.L.R.3d 714.

Validity and construction of regulation by municipal corporation fixing sewer-use rates, 61 A.L.R.3d 1236.

What constitutes "state action" rendering public official's participation in private antitrust activity immune from application of federal antitrust laws, 109 A.L.R. Fed. 758.

Construction and application of 7 USCA § 1926(b), prohibiting curtailment or conditioning of water or sewer service based on inclusion within municipal borders, 146 A.L.R. Fed. 387.

36-34-5.1. Lease agreements for providing library services.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, each municipal corporation of this state is authorized, in the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding lease agreements with nonprofit corporations, classified as public foundations (not private foundations) under the United States Internal Revenue Code, for the stated purpose of providing library services for any period of time not to exceed 15 years.

History

(Ga. L. 1981, p. 833, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 9.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that this Act is applicable to taxable years ending on or after March 11, 1987, and that a taxpayer with a taxable year ending on or after January 1, 1987, and before March 11, 1987, may elect to have the provisions of that Act apply.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that tax, penalty, and interest liabilities and refund eligibility for prior taxable years shall not be affected by that Act.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 191, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, also provided that provisions of the federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 and of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 which as of January 1, 1987, were not yet effective become effective for purposes of Georgia taxation on the same dates as they become effective for federal purposes.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 493.

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1147.

ALR. - Exercise of eminent domain for purpose of library, 66 A.L.R. 1496.

36-34-5.2. Leases and contracts for operation and maintenance of botanical gardens in municipal corporations having population of more than 300,000.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any municipal corporation of this state having a population of more than 300,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census is authorized, in the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding leases and contracts with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations for any period of time not to exceed 50 years to provide for the operation and maintenance of botanical gardens on municipal property.

History

(Ga. L. 1979, p. 4196, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-34-5.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 37.)

36-34-5.3. Leases and contracts for operation and maintenance of public zoos in municipal corporations having population of more than 300,000.

Statute text

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, any municipal corporation of this state having a population of more than 300,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census is authorized, in the discretion of its governing authority, to enter into valid and binding leases and contracts with private persons, firms, associations, or corporations for any period of time not to exceed 50 years to provide for the operation and maintenance of public zoos on municipal property.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 3734, § 1; Code 1981, § 36-34-5.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 38.)

36-34-6. Financing of facilities and services.

Statute text

The governing body of each municipal corporation of this state is given the authority to issue, refund, and liquidate financial obligations, including bonds, incurred to finance any facilities or services which such municipal corporation undertakes to provide under authority of this chapter, subject to the provisions of the Constitution of this state and the general laws applicable to such bonds or other financial obligations.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 7.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 511, 512.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2118 et seq., 2188 et seq.

ALR. - Change in law as to municipal bonds as affecting bonds previously authorized or voted, but not issued, 19 A.L.R. 1055.

Assignment and transfer of government bonds, 22 A.L.R. 775.

Sale of municipal or other public bonds at less than par or face value, 91 A.L.R. 7; 162 A.L.R. 396.

Validity of municipal bond issue for purpose of paying employees, 96 A.L.R. 1204.

Funding or refunding obligations as subject to conditions respecting limitation of indebtedness or approval by voters, 97 A.L.R. 442.

Priority or preference as between different issues of bonds of municipalities or political subdivisions, absent express provisions in that regard, 108 A.L.R. 1018.

Requirement of prior appropriation by municipal authorities as condition of making a contract or incurring expense as applicable to local improvements, or bond issue payable only out of special funds and not constituting an obligation of the municipality, 124 A.L.R. 1467.

Kind or type of contractual obligation within general terms, "contracts," "obligations," etc., or specific terms, "bonds," "notes," etc., in statute validating or legalizing obligations of municipalities or other public bodies, 128 A.L.R. 1411.

Estoppel by recitals in municipal bonds as to lawfulness of issue, 158 A.L.R. 938.

36-34-7. Powers supplemental.

Statute text

The provisions of this chapter are in addition to the powers heretofore or hereafter granted to any municipal corporation.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 8.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 166.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 155, 156. 64 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, § 1460.

36-34-8. Provisions of chapter general law; enactment of local or special laws on subject matters covered by chapter; effect of chapter upon amendment of municipal charters.

Statute text

It is declared to be the intention of the General Assembly that the provisions of this chapter are general laws within the meaning of Article III, Section VI, Paragraph IV(a) of the Constitution. No local or special laws shall be enacted on subject matters over which municipal corporations are authorized to act pursuant to this chapter. Any provision of any municipal charter heretofore enacted covering subject matters over which municipal corporations are authorized to act pursuant to this chapter shall be amended, modified, superseded, or repealed only in accordance with subsection (b) of Code Section 36-35-3.

History

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 820, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 57.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 95, 163 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 139, 142, 150 et seq.

——————————

CHAPTER 35

HOME RULE POWERS

Sec.

36-35-1. Short title.

36-35-2. Incorporation, dissolution, merger, and boundary changes by local Act or under general law; annexation of deannexed property.

36-35-3. Adoption of ordinances, rules, and regulations; amendment of charters and amendment or repeal of ordinances, rules, and regulations by petition and referendum.

36-35-4. Compensation and benefits for employees and members of governing authority; conditions and requirements governing increases for elective members of governing authority.

36-35-4.1. Reapportionment of election districts for municipal elections.

36-35-5. Filing of charter amendments or revisions, notices, and affidavits; publication and distribution of amendments and revisions by Secretary of State.

36-35-6. Limitations on home rule powers.

36-35-6.1. Signs for privately owned businesses.

36-35-7. Provisions of chapter general law; enactment of local or special laws on subject matters covered by chapter; effect of chapter upon amendment of municipal charters.

36-35-8. Effect of conflict with Chapter 34.

Annotations

Cross references. - Constitutional provision authorizing General Assembly to provide for self-government of municipalities, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. II.

Law reviews. - For article, "Home Rule for Home Affairs," see 1 Ga. L. Rev. 24 (1927). For article analyzing alternative means of implementing home rule legislation and advocating home rule for municipalities in light of numerous attempts to pass such legislation in Georgia, prior to repeal of Municipal Home Rule Law of 1951 (Ga. L. 1951, p. 116, § 1 et seq.) and adoption of the Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter), see 8 Mercer L. Rev. 337 (1957). For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article discussing the development of the Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter), see 4 Ga. St. B. J. 317 (1968). For article, "Home Rule: Its Impact on Georgia Local Government Law," see 8 Ga. St. B. J. 277 (1972). For article analyzing the changing relationship between state and local governments in Georgia in light of "Amendment 19," see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 757 (1975). For article discussing limitations on municipalities' "home rule" powers, see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 805 (1978). For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979). For article, "Lawyers Who Represent Local Governments," see 23 Ga. St. B. J. 58 (1987). For annual survey article on local government law, see 50 Mercer L. Rev. 263 (1998).

For note discussing home rule in Georgia under 1947 Home Rule Act (Ga. L. 1947, p. 118, § 1 et seq.), see 1 Mercer L. Rev. 280 (1950).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Municipal corporation which adopts or amends a retirement plan for the municipal corporation's employees must publish a notice of intent. 1973 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U73-119.

Charter consolidating governments of city and county should set out the desired powers of the consolidated government in an enumerated and specific manner. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-413.

36-35-1. Short title.

Statute text

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965."

History

(Ga. L. 1947, p. 1118, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 116, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 1.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article surveying developments in Georgia local government law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1981). For article, "The United States Supreme Court as Home Rule Wrecker," see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 363 (1982).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter) does not provide sole method by which General Assembly may amend a city charter so as to change city boundaries. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Constitutionality of local law extending municipal boundaries. - Local law extending municipal boundaries does not violate the constitutional guarantee of due process of the law because it subjects property owners in the area annexed to taxation by the municipality; nor does the local law deny to such property owners equal protection of the law within the meaning of U.S. Const., amend. 14. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Constitutionality of Municipal Ordinance. - Ordinance providing certain insurance benefits for dependents of city employees who qualified and registered as domestic partners, which defined "dependent" consistent with state law, did not violate the Georgia Constitution or the Municipal Home Rule Act. City of Atlanta v. Morgan, 268 Ga. 586, 492 S.E.2d 193 (1997).

Existence of prior statutes permitting enlargement of boundaries does not deprive General Assembly of power to alter and extend municipal boundaries without the consent of the persons affected thereby. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Both county governments and municipalities may levy taxes for public purposes connected with administration of county and city governments; as a corollary to this principle, it follows that counties and municipalities may appropriate and expend money for such public purpose. Peacock v. Georgia Mun. Ass'n, 247 Ga. 740, 279 S.E.2d 434 (1981).

Former Code 1933, § 69-904 et seq. was a "general law" and provided a method of municipal annexation as contemplated by the Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-35-1 et seq.). Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

Cited in Dodson v. Graham, 462 F.2d 144 (5th Cir. 1972); Burnley v. Thompson, 524 F.2d 1233 (5th Cir. 1975).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

No city acting under this chapter could alter court having jurisdiction over state offenses. 1971 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U71-30.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 109, 110.

36-35-2. Incorporation, dissolution, merger, and boundary changes by local Act or under general law; annexation of deannexed property.

Statute text

(a) No municipal corporation shall be incorporated, dissolved, merged, or consolidated with any other municipal corporation, or have its municipal boundaries changed except by local Act of the General Assembly or by such methods as may be provided by general law.

(b) Whenever any local Act of the General Assembly deannexes property lying within the boundaries of a municipal corporation, such property shall not be subject to annexation under Chapter 36 of this title by the municipal corporation from which the property was deannexed for a period of three years from such deannexation.

History

(Ga. L. 1947, p. 1118, § 2; Ga. L. 1951, p. 116, § 2; Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1983, p. 545, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2592, § 2.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Nature of general laws. - Laws operating uniformly throughout the state with respect to the subject matter, but applying only to cities or counties of a common class having a certain number of inhabitants or more, are general statutes as contemplated by this section. Niskey Lake Water Works, Inc. v. Garner, 228 Ga. 864, 188 S.E.2d 864 (1972).

Constitutionality of local law extending municipal boundaries. - Local law extending municipal boundaries does not violate the constitutional guarantee of due process of the law because the local law subjects property owners in the area annexed to taxation by the municipality; nor does the local law deny to such property owners equal protection of the law within the meaning of U.S. Const., amend. 14. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Local act changing city limits so as to exclude developer's property, thereby vitiating any authority of the city to permit development of the property, was not unconstitutional. Signa Dev. Corp. v. Fayette County, 259 Ga. 11, 375 S.E.2d 839 (1989), cert. denied, 493 U.S. 814, 110 S. Ct. 63, 107 L. Ed. 2d 30 (1989).

This chapter does not provide the sole method by which the General Assembly may amend a city charter so as to change city boundaries. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Existence of prior statutes permitting enlargement of boundaries does not deprive the General Assembly of the power to alter and extend municipal boundaries without the consent of the persons affected thereby. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Cited in Dodson v. Graham, 462 F.2d 144 (5th Cir. 1972).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Altering boundaries by local Act. - There is evidence of intent on the part of the General Assembly to retain authority to alter municipal boundaries through local Acts. 1975 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U75-59.

"Deannexation" of property presently lying within boundaries of municipal corporation may only be accomplished through local legislation amending the corporate charter so as to redefine the corporate boundaries. 1977 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U77-49.

Annexation of state park. - Municipality must have specific legislative approval to annex state park. 1968 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 68-211.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 31 et seq., 74 et seq.

C.J.S. - 62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 15, 16, 24, 57, 73, 107.

36-35-3. Adoption of ordinances, rules, and regulations; amendment of charters and amendment or repeal of ordinances, rules, and regulations by petition and referendum.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority of each municipal corporation shall have legislative power to adopt clearly reasonable ordinances, resolutions, or regulations relating to its property, affairs, and local government for which no provision has been made by general law and which are not inconsistent with the Constitution or any charter provision applicable thereto. Any such charter provision shall remain in force and effect until amended or repealed as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. This Code section, however, shall not restrict the authority of the General Assembly, by general law, to define this home rule power further or to broaden, limit, or otherwise regulate the exercise thereof. The General Assembly shall not pass any local law to repeal, modify, or supersede any action taken by a municipal governing authority under this Code section, except as authorized under Code Section 36-35-6.

(b) Except as provided in Code Section 36-35-6, a municipal corporation may, as an incident of its home rule power, amend its charter by following either of the following procedures:

(1) Municipal charters may be amended by ordinances duly adopted at two regular consecutive meetings of the municipal governing authority, not less than seven nor more than 60 days apart. A notice containing a synopsis of the proposed amendment shall be published in the official organ of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation once a week for three weeks within a period of 60 days immediately preceding its final adoption. The notice shall state that a copy of the proposed amendment is on file in the office of the clerk or the recording officer of the municipal governing authority and in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation for the purpose of examination and inspection by the public. The recording officer of the municipal governing authority shall furnish anyone, upon written request, a copy of the proposed amendment. No amendment under this paragraph shall be valid to change or repeal an amendment adopted pursuant to a referendum as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection or to change or repeal a local Act of the General Assembly ratified in a referendum as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection or to change or repeal a local Act of the General Assembly ratified in a referendum by the electors of the municipal corporation unless at least 12 months have elapsed after such referendums. No amendment under this paragraph shall be valid if provision has been made therefor by general law; or

(2) (A) Amendments to charters or amendments to or repeals of ordinances, resolutions, or regulations adopted pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section may be initiated by a petition, filed with the governing authority of the municipal corporation, containing, in cases of municipal corporations with a population of 5,000 or less, the signatures of at least 25 percent of the electors registered to vote in the last general municipal election; in cases of municipal corporations with a population of more than 5,000 but not more than 100,000, at least 20 percent of the electors registered to vote in the last general municipal election; and in cases of municipal corporations with a population of more than 100,000, at least 15 percent of the electors registered to vote in the last general municipal election. The petition shall specifically set forth the exact language of the proposed amendment or repeal. The governing authority shall determine the validity of such petition within 50 days of its filing with the governing authority. In the event that the governing authority determines that such petition is valid, it shall be the duty of such authority to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting such amendment or repeal to the registered electors of the municipal corporation for their approval or rejection. Such call shall be issued within one week after the determination of the validity of the petition. The governing authority shall set the date of the election as provided in Code Section 21-2-540. The governing authority shall cause a notice of the date of the election to be published in the official organ of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation once a week for two weeks immediately preceding such date. The notice shall also contain a synopsis of the proposed amendment or repeal and shall state that a copy thereof is on file in the office of the clerk or the recording officer of the municipal governing authority and in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation, for the purpose of examination and inspection by the public. The recording officer of the municipal governing authority shall furnish anyone, upon written request, a copy of the proposed amendment. If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of the amendment or the repeal, the same shall become of full force and effect; otherwise it shall be void and of no force and effect. The expense of the election shall be borne by the municipal corporation. It shall be the duty of the governing authority to hold and conduct such election. The election shall be held under the same laws and rules and regulations as govern special elections of the municipal corporation, except as otherwise provided in this subparagraph. It shall be the duty of the governing authority to canvass the returns and to declare and certify the result of the election. It shall be the further duty of the governing authority to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State. A referendum on any such amendment or repeal shall not be held more often than once each year. No amendment under this subparagraph shall be valid if provision has been made therefor by general law.

(B) In the event that the governing authority determines that the petition is not valid, it shall publish in explicit detail the reasons why such petition is not valid. Such publication shall be in the official organ of the county of the legal situs of the municipal corporation or in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipal corporation, in the week immediately following the date on which the petition is declared to be not valid. In any proceeding in which the validity of the petition is at issue, the tribunal considering such issue shall not be limited by the reasons assigned.

(C) The sponsor of a petition authorized by this paragraph shall obtain copies of all official petitions from the clerk of the governing authority. The clerk of the governing authority shall approve all petitions as to form. The clerk of the governing authority shall provide a place on each form for the person collecting signatures to provide his or her name, street address, city, county, state, ZIP Code, and telephone number and to swear that he or she is a resident of the municipality affected by the petition and that the signatures were collected inside the boundaries of the affected municipality. The collection of signatures for the petition shall begin on the day the clerk of the governing authority provides official copies to the sponsor of the petition. A petition authorized by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall not be accepted by the governing authority for verification if more than 60 days have elapsed since the date the sponsor of the petition first obtained copies of the petition from the clerk of the governing authority. Any petition being circulated pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph on July 1, 1989, shall be filed with the clerk of the governing authority by not later than July 11, 1989. The clerk of the governing authority shall, within seven days, provide the sponsor with official petitions. The sponsor shall have 60 additional days after obtaining official petitions to collect the remaining number of required signatures. Nothing in this subparagraph shall invalidate otherwise valid signatures collected on or before July 1, 1989.

(c) Any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to any city-county consolidated government in existence on January 1, 1976, and any such city-county consolidated government shall not be authorized to amend its consolidated government charter pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1965, p. 298, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 296, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 1429, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1584, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 3.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "The Municipal Home Rule Act of 1965 (this chapter)," see 3 Ga. St. B. J. 333 (1967). For article as to the power of Georgia local governments to regulate the trades and occupations of its citizens, see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 115 (1974). For article, "Extraterritorial Power in Georgia Municipal Law," see 12 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (1977). For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For note on the validity of population statutes in Georgia, see 2 Ga. St. B. J. 533 (1966).

For comment, "Making Debt Pay: Examining the Use of Property Tax Delinquency as a Revenue Source," see 62 Emory L.J. 217 (2012).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

ANALYSIS

General Consideration

Powers of Municipalities

Validity of Ordinances

General Consideration

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this Code section and under Ga. L. 1927, p. 99 and former Code 1933, § 22-103 are included in the annotations for this Code section.

Municipal corporation is a public corporation, being a subordinate agent of the state, exercising governmental functions in a certain community; and while an ordinance enacted by such governmental agency may in that sense be a law of the state, it is not a law of the state as is contemplated in the Constitution defining the jurisdiction of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals. Maner v. Dykes, 183 Ga. 118, 187 S.E. 699 (1936).

County's election authority. - County's method of not counting abstentions by county commissioners, and therefore not considering abstentions as either affirmative or negative votes, was within the county's authority; thus, a citizen challenging the method of counting votes was not entitled to declaratory relief. Merry v. Williams, 281 Ga. 571, 642 S.E.2d 46 (2007).

This chapter does not provide sole method by which General Assembly may amend city charter so as to change the city boundaries. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Subsection (b). - Procedure for petition and referendum in subsection (b) of O.C.G.A. § 36-35-3 applies only to amendments to municipal charters. Kemp v. City of Claxton, 269 Ga. 173, 496 S.E.2d 712 (1998).

Municipality not estopped from attacking local law passed after charter granted. - When a local law vitally affecting the rights and powers granted to a municipality by charter is passed subsequently to the granting of the charter, the municipality is not estopped from attacking the provisions of the local law on the ground that the provisions are unconstitutional and void. City of Moultrie v. Moultrie Banking Co., 175 Ga. 738, 165 S.E. 814 (1932) (decided under Ga. L. 1927, p. 99).

O.C.G.A. § 36-35-3 is inapplicable when a municipality's obligation to make available to customers sufficient information about electricity rates is at issue. City of Commerce v. Duncan & Godfrey, Inc., 157 Ga. App. 337, 277 S.E.2d 266 (1981).

City charter provision on term limits for police officers prevailed over police department personnel manual provisions covering the dismissal of police department employees. City of Buchanan v. Pope, 222 Ga. App. 716, 476 S.E.2d 53 (1996).

Quo warranto granted to remove a city attorney improperly appointed by the mayor. - Writ of quo warranto challenging a city mayor's appointment of a city attorney was properly granted because a council member's abstention on a motion to delegate the power of appointment to the mayor was no vote at all; therefore, there was no tie vote on the motion, and the mayor was not authorized to vote in its favor, leaving authority to appoint an attorney with the council, in accordance with the city charter. Jones v. Boone, 297 Ga. 437, 774 S.E.2d 668 (2015).

Cited in Dodson v. Graham, 462 F.2d 144 (5th Cir. 1972); Jackson v. Inman, 232 Ga. 566, 207 S.E.2d 475 (1974); Savage v. City of Atlanta, 242 Ga. 671, 251 S.E.2d 268 (1978); DeClue v. City of Clayton, 246 Ga. App. 487, 540 S.E.2d 675 (2000); Beaman v. City of Peachtree City, 256 Ga. App. 62, 567 S.E.2d 715 (2002).

Powers of Municipalities

Municipality is a creature of the legislature deriving the municipality's powers and privileges from that body through the municipality's charter. The municipality's ordinances are laws, but only laws of the municipality itself. Maner v. Dykes, 183 Ga. 118, 187 S.E. 699 (1936) (decided under former law).

Municipalities lawfully may exercise powers necessarily implied from powers expressly granted. Goodman v. City of Atlanta, 246 Ga. 79, 268 S.E.2d 663 (1980).

In determining the validity of an ordinance, the court must decide whether the city had the power to enact the ordinance and whether the exercise of the city's power is clearly reasonable. City of Atlanta v. McKinney, 265 Ga. 161, 454 S.E.2d 517 (1995).

Existence of police power dependent on express grant by state. - Police power, while it is an attribute of sovereignty and an inherent power of national and state government because the existence of government as well as the social order, security, life, and health of the individual citizen depend upon it, is a power possessed by municipal corporations only if, where, and to the extent there has been an express grant by the state. Palmer v. Hall, 380 F. Supp. 120 (M.D. Ga. 1974), modified, 517 F.2d 705 (5th Cir. 1975).

Fundamental and substantive changes in city government cannot be made by a municipality under general home rule laws. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Authority to enact new charters including drastic changes in city government reserved in General Assembly. - The General Assembly has reserved the legislative power to enact new charters for existing cities when such charters include drastic changes in the composition and form of city government, and the election and terms of office of the members of the governing authority of cities. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Authority to adopt ordinance amending city charter. - Authority of a municipality to adopt an ordinance amending its city charter cannot be derived from subsection (a), which prohibits the enactment of local ordinances inconsistent with municipal charter provisions. The ordinance must be adopted pursuant to the procedures set out in subsection (b), which establishes one of two methods through which a municipality may amend a municipality's charter without the intervention of the General Assembly. Bruck v. City of Temple, 240 Ga. 411, 240 S.E.2d 876 (1977).

Power to regulate markets and provide reasonable rules for their conduct, looking to the health and safety of a city or community, is a right within the scope of municipal regulation, and the court will not interfere with the exercise of the discretion granted to municipalities upon the ground of unreasonableness, except in a clear case. Jones v. City of Atlanta, 51 Ga. App. 218, 179 S.E. 922 (1935) (decided under former law).

Constitutionality of local law extending municipal boundaries. - Local law extending municipal boundaries does not violate the constitutional guarantee of due process of the law because the local law subjects property owners in the area annexed to taxation by the municipality; nor does the local law deny to such property owners equal protection of the law within the meaning of U.S. Const., amend. 14. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Existence of prior statutes permitting enlargement of boundaries does not deprive General Assembly of power to alter and extend municipal boundaries without the consent of the persons affected thereby. Lee v. City of Jesup, 222 Ga. 530, 150 S.E.2d 836 (1966), cert. denied, 386 U.S. 993, 87 S. Ct. 1307, 18 L. Ed. 2d 337 (1967).

Liability of municipality for bail policy. - In Georgia, a municipality had power under O.C.G.A. § 36-35-3(a), Ga. Unif. Mun. Ct. R. 18.1, and the municipality's charter to set a bail policy for its municipal court, and its police also had authority under O.C.G.A. §§ 17-6-2(b) and 42-4-1(b); therefore, the municipality could be held liable under 42 U.S.C. § 1983 for constitutional violations relating to the municipality's bail policy. Walker v. City of Calhoun, 901 F.3d 1245 (11th Cir. 2018), cert. denied, 139 S. Ct. 1446, 2019 U.S. LEXIS 2446, 203 L. Ed. 2d 681 (U.S. 2019).

Validity of Ordinances

Ordinance which infringes upon common or statute law is void. Cruise v. City of Rome, 94 Ga. App. 373, 94 S.E.2d 617 (1956).

Reasonableness of ordinance a question of law. - Ordinances of a municipal body under a power vested in the municipal body are conclusive on the courts unless so unreasonable or oppressive of the rights of the citizen as to constitute an attempted abuse rather than a legitimate use of the power; but the reasonableness of an ordinance is a question of law and municipal ordinances are reviewable by the courts as to reasonableness. If found to be unreasonable, those ordinances will be held void. Cruise v. City of Rome, 94 Ga. App. 373, 94 S.E.2d 617 (1956) (decided under former law).

Legislation by municipal corporation must be put in form of an ordinance, and acts that are done in a ministerial capacity and for temporary purposes may be in the form of a resolution. Allen v. Wise, 204 Ga. 415, 50 S.E.2d 69 (1948) (decided under former law).
